tools/hyphenators/hyph_smj.dic
ö2r1k
ös2
1ö1sa
1ö1s2e
ö2s2m
ö2s2o
ö1t2e1
ö1t2v1
ö2v
öve1r1
ö1ve
ö1w2c1
2öy
öz2
öøf1
1åa
åb1di1
å2b1d
å1b1f2
åc2
å1d2á
å2d1j
åd1n2e1
å2d1n2
å1d2o
åek1
å1f2
å1g
åge1
åg1g2i1
å2g1g
å1g2i1
å2g1s
1å2h1n2
å1hå
å1i
å1j2a
å1j2e
å2j2i
å1j2u
1åjv
å2k1
åki2e1
å1ki
å1k2r
1åk1r2i
1å2k1t
å2l2s
2åm
å2m2o1
å2m1s1
å2n2e
å1nj
å2n1n1
å1n2u
2åŋ
åŋ1g2i1
åŋ1g
å1o
åp2
å1p2e1
å2p1t1
å2r2j
1år1o1
år2s1s
å2r1s
å1s
1å2s2a1l
å1sa
1å1s2e
å2s2j
å2s2j2d
å2s1l
ås1s2u1
å2ss
å2s2v
åš2
åt1s2i1
å1t2s2
åt1v2i1
å1t2v
åt2ø
å2t1å
1å2t`
å1u
å2v1m
åv2r
1å2v1t
å1w
å1å
åå1s1
'2h
'1ha1
'j2
`j2
´j2
1°2c1
°2f1
